Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.30
Restaurant, defined.

Restaurant means any public
place (1) which is kept, used, maintained, advertised, and held out to the
public as a place where meals are served and where meals are actually and
regularly served, (2) which has no sleeping accommodations, and (3) which
has adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity and
a sufficient number and kind of employees to prepare, cook, and serve suitable
food for its guests.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 38.